Florida, session 2026, HB1369.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (f) of subsection (8) of section
112.3144, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
112.3144 Full and public disclosure of financial
interests.—
(8) Forms or fields of information for compliance with the
full and public disclosure requirements of s. 8, Art. II of the
State Constitution must be prescribed by the commission. The
commission shall allow a filer to include attachments or other
supporting documentation when filing a disclosure. The
commission shall give notice of disclosure deadlines and
delinquencies and distribute forms in the following manner:
(f) Except as provided in subparagraph 3., a Any person
who is required to file full and public disclosure of financial
interests and whose name is on the commission's list, and to
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1369 2026
whom notice has been sent, but who fails to timely file is
assessed a fine of $25 per day for each day late up to a maximum
of $1,500; however this $1,500 limitation on automatic fines
does not limit the civil penalty that may be imposed if the
statement is filed more than 60 days after the deadline and a
complaint is filed, as provided in s. 112.324. The commission
must provide by rule the grounds for waiving the fine and the
procedures by which each person whose name is on the list and
who is determined to have not filed in a timely manner will be
notified of assessed fines and may appeal. The rule must provide
for and make specific that the amount of the fine due is based
upon when the disclosure is filed on the electronic filing
system created and maintained by the commission as provided in
s. 112.31446.
1. Upon receipt of the disclosure statement or upon
accrual of the maximum penalty, whichever occurs first, the
commission shall determine the amount of the fine which is due
and shall notify the delinquent person. The notice must include
an explanation of the appeal procedure under subparagraph 2.
Such fine must be paid within 30 days after the notice of
payment due is transmitted, unless appeal is made to the
commission pursuant to subparagraph 2. The moneys shall be
deposited into the General Revenue Fund.
2. Any reporting person may appeal or dispute a fine,
based upon unusual circumstances surrounding the failure to file
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1369 2026
on the designated due date, and may request and is entitled to a
hearing before the commission, which may waive the fine in whole
or in part for good cause shown. Any such request must be in
writing and received by the commission within 30 days after the
notice of payment due is transmitted. In such a case, the
reporting person must, within the 30-day period, notify the
person designated to review the timeliness of reports in writing
of his or her intention to bring the matter before the
commission. For purposes of this subparagraph, "unusual
circumstances" does not include the failure to monitor an e-mail
account or failure to receive notice if the person has not
notified the commission of a change in his or her e-mail
address.
3. A fine may not be assessed against a reporting person
the first time a full and public disclosure of financial
interests for which he or she is responsible for filing is not
timely filed if the full and public disclosure of financial
interests was filed before the reporting person accrued the
maximum automatic fine for that filing year and the reporting
person has not previously received a waiver of an automatic fine
pursuant to this subparagraph or s. 112.3145(8)(f)3. The
automatic fine shall be assessed; however, if the reporting
person has in a previous year accrued the maximum automatic fine
pursuant to this subparagraph or s. 112.3145(8)(f), or if he or
she has previously received a waiver of an automatic fine
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1369 2026
pursuant to this subparagraph or s. 112.3145(8)(f)3. This
subparagraph applies to fines that began to accrue pursuant to
this paragraph after September 1, 2026.
Section 2. Paragraph (f) of subsection (8) of section
112.3145, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
112.3145 Disclosure of financial interests and clients
represented before agencies.—
(8) Beginning January 1, 2024, forms for compliance with
the disclosure requirements of this section and a current list
of persons subject to disclosure must be created by the
commission. The commission shall allow a filer to include
attachments or other supporting documentation when filing a
disclosure. Beginning January 1, 2024, the commission shall give
notice of disclosure deadlines, delinquencies, and instructions
in the following manner:
(f) Except as provided in subparagraph 3., a Any person
required to file a statement of financial interests whose name
is on the commission's list, and to whom notice has been sent,
but who fails to timely file is assessed a fine of $25 per day
for each day late up to a maximum of $1,500; however, this
$1,500 limitation on automatic fines does not limit the civil
penalty that may be imposed if the statement is filed more than
60 days after the deadline and a complaint is filed, as provided
in s. 112.324. The commission must provide by rule the grounds
100 for waiving the fine and procedures by which each person whose
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1369 2026
101 name is on the list and who is determined to have not filed in a
102 timely manner will be notified of assessed fines and may appeal.
103 The rule must provide for and make specific that the amount of
104 the fine is based upon the date and time that the disclosure is
105 filed on the electronic filing system as provided in s.
106 112.31446.
107 1. Beginning January 1, 2024, for a specified state
108 employee, state officer, or local officer, upon receipt of the
109 disclosure statement by the commission or upon accrual of the
110 maximum penalty, whichever occurs first, the commission shall
111 determine the amount of the fine which is due and shall notify
112 the delinquent person. The notice must include an explanation of
113 the appeal procedure under subparagraph 2. The fine must be paid
114 within 30 days after the notice of payment due is transmitted,
115 unless appeal is made to the commission pursuant to subparagraph
116 2. The moneys are to be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.
117 2. Any reporting person may appeal or dispute a fine,
118 based upon unusual circumstances surrounding the failure to file
119 on the designated due date, and may request and is entitled to a
120 hearing before the commission, which may waive the fine in whole
121 or in part for good cause shown. Any such request must be in
122 writing and received by the commission within 30 days after the
123 notice of payment due is transmitted. In such a case, the
124 reporting person must, within the 30-day period, notify the
125 person designated to review the timeliness of reports in writing
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1369 2026
126 of his or her intention to bring the matter before the
127 commission. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term "unusual
128 circumstances" does not include the failure to monitor an e-mail
129 account or failure to receive notice if the person has not
130 notified the commission of a change in his or her e-mail
131 address.
132 3. A fine may not be assessed against a reporting person
133 the first time a statement of financial interests for which he
134 or she is responsible for filing is not timely filed if the
135 statement of financial interests was filed before the reporting
136 person accrued the maximum automatic fine for that filing year
137 and the reporting person has not previously received a waiver of
138 an automatic fine pursuant to this subparagraph or s.
139 112.3144(8)(f)3. The automatic fine shall be assessed; however,
140 if the reporting person has in a previous year accrued the
141 maximum automatic fine pursuant to this subparagraph or s.
142 112.3144(8)(f), or if he or she previously received a waiver of
143 an automatic fine pursuant to this subparagraph or s.
144 112.3144(8)(f)3. This subparagraph applies to fines that began
145 to accrue pursuant to this paragraph after September 1, 2026.
146 Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1369-00